Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-6,111
Persons riding animals or driving animal-drawn vehicles; farm implements; duties.

(1) Except as provided in section 60-6,378.02, any person who rides an animal or drives an animal-drawn vehicle, a farm tractor, or an implement of husbandry upon a roadway shall be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties made applicable to the driver of a vehicle by the Nebraska Rules of the Road except those provisions of the rules which by their very nature can have no application.

(2) Except as provided in section 60-6,378.02, whenever the slowness of such animal, animal-drawn vehicle, farm tractor, or implement of husbandry is obstructing the normal flow of traffic, the rider or driver shall drive to the nearest available shoulder of the highway and allow traffic to pass.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-605;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 207;

Laws 2026, LB977, § 2.
July 18, 2026